Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.140

Inspections and certifications—Request for—Fees.

(1) Any person financially interested in any fruits or vegetables in this state may request inspection and/or certification services provided for those fruits or vegetables under this chapter.

(2) To facilitate the movement or sale of fruits and vegetables or other agricultural commodities, the director may provide, if requested by growers or other interested persons, special inspections or certifications not otherwise authorized under this chapter and shall prescribe a fee for that service.

(3) Persons requesting services shall be responsible for payment of fees for those services prescribed by the director under RCW 15.17.150.

[ 1998 c 154 s 9; 1963 c 122 s 14.]